Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.116.070

State matching funds—Transfer of funds from trust fund to endowment fund.

(1) The office may deposit twenty-five thousand dollars of state matching funds into the foster care scholarship endowment fund when the office can match state funds with an equal amount of private cash donations.

(2) After the initial match of twenty-five thousand dollars, state matching funds from the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund shall be released to the foster care scholarship endowment fund semiannually so long as there are funds available in the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 219; 2005 c 215 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.